Tennessee, session 114, SB0421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-11-311(c)(2)(P), is amended by
deleting "at any given time." and substituting "at any given time; or".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-11-311(c)(2), is amended by
designating subdivisions (A)-(P) as subdivisions (A)(1)-(16) and adding the following new
subdivision:
(B)
(1) Has an active registration with the federal drug enforcement agency;
(2) Is employed by or contracts with a state correctional facility, as
defined in § 41-21-206, or a county or municipal jail to provide healthcare
services on-site or via telemedicine; and
(3) Has adopted clinical protocols for the facilitation or continuance of
medication-assisted treatment for persons who are incarcerated in or to be
released from such state correctional facility or county or municipal jail.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0421
000481
- 1 -